Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.725

Health extension program—Dissemination of evidence-based tools and resources—Rules.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall establish a health extension program to provide training, tools, and technical assistance to primary care, behavioral health, and other providers. The program must emphasize high quality preventive, chronic disease, and behavioral health care that is comprehensive and evidence-based.

(2) The health extension program must coordinate dissemination of evidence-based tools and resources that promote:

(a) Integration of physical and behavioral health;

(b) Clinical decision support to promote evidence-based care;

(c) Reports of the Robert Bree collaborative created by RCW 70.250.050 and findings of health technology assessments under RCW 70.14.080 through 70.14.130;

(d) Methods of formal assessment;

(e) Support for patients managing their own conditions;

(f) Identification and use of resources that are available in the community for patients and their families, including community health workers; and

(g) Identification of evidence-based models to effectively treat depression and other conditions in primary care settings, such as the program advancing integrated mental health solutions, and others.

(3) The department may adopt rules necessary to implement this section, but may not adopt rules, policies, or procedures beyond the scope of authority granted in this section.

[ 2014 c 223 s 5.]

NOTES:

Finding—2014 c 223: See note following RCW 41.05.690.